South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4701.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-2645 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 12-37-2645.  For purposes of determining the appropriate assessment ratio used in the calculation of the assessed value of a motor vehicle and for defining those motor vehicles subject to the assessment ratios provided in Section 1(8)(B)(a) of Article X of the Constitution of this State, the definition of "private passenger motor vehicle" provided in Section 56-3-630 applies except that in the case of pickup trucks, the empty weight and gross weight limits provided in that definition are increased respectively to nine thousand pounds or less and eleven fifteen thousand pounds or less and the definition is deemed to include motorcycles. SECTION 2.  Section 56-3-630 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-3-630.  The Department of Motor Vehicles shall classify as a private passenger motor vehicle every motor vehicle which is designed, used, and maintained for the transportation of ten or fewer persons and trucks having an empty weight of nine thousand pounds or less and a gross weight of eleven fifteen thousand pounds or less, except a motorcycle, motorcycle three-wheel vehicle, or moped. The department shall classify a three-wheel vehicle by the manufacturer's certificate of origin for the vehicles initial registration. For subsequent registration, the department shall classify the three-wheel vehicle by its title document. This section does not relieve or negate any applicable fees required under Section 56-3-660. SECTION 3.  Section 12-28-1920 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 12-28-1920.  The department may assign qualified persons who are not state police officers to supervise or operate permanent or portable weigh stations. A person assigned under this section may stop, inspect, and issue citations to operators of trucks and trailers, barges or vessels having a declared gross weight of eleven fifteen thousand pounds or more, and buses, at a permanent weigh station, or other inspection point, or while operating a clearly marked state police vehicle for violations of this chapter. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to property tax years beginning after 2025. ----XX----